Maryland, session 2025, SB0104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PARENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL AT LEAST 70 YEARS
OLD WHO IS A BIOLOGICAL OR ADOPTIVE PARENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL.
(B) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL MAY
CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO $3,000
IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0104*

SENATE BILL 104
(1) RESIDES IN THE SAME PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE AS THE
INDIVIDUAL’S PARENT FOR AT LEAST 6 MONTHS DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR;
(2) PROVIDES CARE FOR THE PARENT;
(3) IS NOT A DEPENDENT OF ANOTHER TAXPAYER; AND
(4) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, HAS FEDERAL
ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME THAT DOES NOT EXCEED:
(I) $103,650 FOR AN INDIVIDUAL TAX RETURN; OR
(II) $161,000 FOR A JOINT TAX RETURN.
(C) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY CLAIM A CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION FOR
MORE THAN ONE PARENT.
(2) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE
CLAIMED BY MULTIPLE INDIVIDUALS IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD WITH RESPECT TO
THE SAME PARENT.
(3) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE
YEAR EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE INDIVIDUAL
MAY CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
(D) (1) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2025, THE MAXIMUM INCOME THRESHOLDS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE INCREASED BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE PRODUCT OF THE
MAXIMUM INCOME THRESHOLDS AND COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT SPECIFIED IN
THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COST–OF–LIVING
ADJUSTMENT IS THE COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT WITHIN THE MEANING OF §
1(F)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH A
TAXABLE YEAR BEGINS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMPTROLLER, BY SUBSTITUTING
“CALENDAR YEAR 2024” FOR “CALENDAR YEAR 2016” IN § 1(F)(3)(A) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(3) IF ANY INCREASE DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS NOT A MULTIPLE OF $50, THE INCREASE SHALL BE ROUNDED DOWN
TO THE NEXT LOWEST MULTIPLE OF $50.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.